Utah statutes.
41-6a-1401.   Standing or parking vehicles -- Restrictions and exceptions.

(1)  Except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic, or in compliance with law, the directions of a peace officer, or a traffic-control device, a person may not:

(a)  stop, stand, or park a vehicle:

(i)  on the roadway side of any vehicle stopped or parked at the edge or curb of a street;

(ii)  on a sidewalk;

(iii)  within an intersection;

(iv)  on a crosswalk;

(v)  between a safety zone and the adjacent curb or within 30 feet of points on the curb immediately opposite the ends of a safety zone, unless a different length is indicated by signs or markings;

(vi)  alongside or opposite any street excavation or obstruction when stopping, standing, or parking would obstruct traffic;

(vii) on any bridge or other elevated structure, on a highway, or within a highway tunnel;

(viii)  on any railroad tracks;

(ix)  on any controlled-access highway;

(x)  in the area between roadways of a divided highway, including crossovers; or

(xi)  any place where a traffic-control device prohibits stopping, standing, or parking; or

(b)  stand or park a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except momentarily to pick up or discharge a passenger or passengers:

(i)  in front of a public or private driveway;

(ii)  within 15 feet of a fire hydrant;

(iii)  within 20 feet of a crosswalk;

(iv)  within 30 feet upon the approach to any flashing signal, stop sign, yield sign, or traffic-control signal located at the side of a roadway;

(v)  within 20 feet of the driveway entrance to any fire station and on the side of a street opposite the entrance to any fire station within 75 feet of the entrance when properly signposted; or

(vi)  at any place where a traffic-control device prohibits standing; or

(c)  park a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except temporarily for the purpose of and while actually engaged in loading or unloading property or passengers:

(i)  within 50 feet of the nearest rail of a railroad crossing; or

(ii)  at any place where traffic-control devices prohibit parking.

(2)  A person may not move a vehicle that is not lawfully under the person's control into any prohibited area or into an unlawful distance from the curb.

